Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,150
Student achievement coordinator; appointment; qualifications; duties.

The Commissioner of Education shall appoint a student achievement coordinator, subject to confirmation by a majority vote of the members of the State Board of Education. The appointment shall be made on the basis of recognized and demonstrated background and training in instructional methods to address the unique educational needs of students in poverty, limited English proficient students, and highly mobile students. The coordinator shall evaluate and coordinate existing resources for effective programs for students in poverty, limited English proficient students, and highly mobile students across the state. The coordinator shall also develop a plan to improve educational attainment for such students. In developing the plan, the coordinator shall seek input from superintendents, principals, teachers, and other individuals with relevant expertise. The plan may include research efforts to be conducted by Nebraska postsecondary educational institutions. The plan shall be presented to the Education Committee of the Legislature on or before November 1, 2008.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 112;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 33.